en: Pearl surface condition: Blemished (severe); Clean; Heavily spotted; Lightly spotted; Moderately spotted; Other
nb: Overflatekvalitet på perle: Med pletter (alvorlig); Ren; Mye pletter; Litt pletter; Moderat med pletter; Annet
tr: İnci yüzey durumu: Ağır kusurlu; Temiz; Çok lekeli; Hafif lekeli; Orta derecede lekeli; Diğer
pt-BR: Pérola condição da superfície: Com manchas (graves); Limpa; Muito manchada; Pouco manchada; Moderadamente manchada; Outra
nl: Parel oppervlakconditie: Met oneffenheden (ernstig); Schoon; Zwaar gevlekt; Licht gevlekt; Matig gevlekt; Overig
el: Κατάσταση επιφάνειας μαργαριταριού: Με ψεγάδια (σοβαρά); Καθαρό; Με πολλά στίγματα; Με λίγα στίγματα; Με μέτρια στίγματα; Άλλο
ro-RO: Stare suprafață perlată: Cu imperfecțiuni (sever); Curată; Foarte pătată; Ușor pătată; Moderat pătată; Altele
th: พื้นผิวมุกเป็นเวลานานสินค้า: มีตำหนิ (มาก); ไร้ตำหนิ; มีจุดด่างดำมาก; มีจุดด่างดำเล็กน้อย; มีจุดด่างดำปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
hu: Gyöngy felületi állapota: Hibás (súlyos); Tiszta; Erősen foltos; Enyhén foltos; Mérsékelten foltos; Egyéb
it: Condizione della superficie della perla: Con imperfezioni (gravi); Pulita; Molto macchiata; Leggermente macchiata; Moderatamente macchiata; Altro
fi: Helmiäispinnan kunto: Virheellinen (runsaasti); Puhdas; Runsaasti täpliä; Hieman täpliä; Kohtalaisesti täpliä; Muu
zh-CN: 珍珠表面状况: 有瑕疵（严重）; 无瑕疵; 严重斑点; 轻微斑点; 中度斑点; 其他
ja: 真珠の表面状態: 傷あり（重度）; クリーン; しみ多め; しみ少なめ; しみ中程度; その他
ru: Состояние поверхности жемчуга: С дефектами (сильно); Чистая; Сильно пятнистая; Слегка пятнистая; Умеренно пятнистая; Другое
cs: Perleťový povrch: S kazy (závažné); Čistý; Silně skvrnitý; Lehce skvrnitý; Středně skvrnitý; Ostatní
pl: Stan powierzchni perły: Ze skazami (znacznymi); Czysta; Mocno poplamiona; Lekko poplamiona; Średnio poplamiona; Inne
zh-TW: 珍珠表面狀況: 有瑕疵 (嚴重); 乾淨無瑕; 多斑點; 少斑點; 中等斑點; 其他
sk-SK: Povrchový stav perál: S chybami (výrazné); Čistý; Silne škvrnitý; Mierne škvrnitý; Stredne škvrnitý; Iné
da: Perlens overfladestand: Plettet (alvorligt); Ren; Kraftigt plettet; Let plettet; Moderat plettet; Andet
vi: Tình trạng bề mặt của ngọc trai: Có tì vết (nặng); Sạch; Nhiều đốm; Ít đốm; Có đốm vừa phải; Khác
bg-BG: Обща категория на формата на перлата: С дефекти (тежки); Чиста; Силно петниста; Леко петниста; Умерено петниста; Друго
lt-LT: Perlo paviršiaus būklė: Dėmėtas (smarkiai); Švarus; Labai dėmėtas; Šiek tiek dėmėtas; Vidutiniškai dėmėtas; Kita
es: Estado de la superficie de la perla: Con imperfecciones (severas); Limpia; Con muchas manchas; Con manchas ligeras; Con manchas moderadas; Otra
sl-SI: Stanje površine biserov: Z napakami (močnimi); Čista; Zelo lisasta; Malo lisasta; Zmerno lisasta; Drugo
sv: Pärlytans skick: Fläckig (allvarlig); Ren; Mycket fläckig; Lätt fläckig; Måttligt fläckig; Övrigt
pt-PT: Estado da superfície da pérola: Com defeitos (grave); Limpa; Com muitas manchas; Com poucas manchas; Moderadamente manchada; Outro
de: Zustand der Perlenoberfläche: Fehlerhaft (stark); Sauber; Stark gefleckt; Leicht gefleckt; Mäßig gefleckt; Sonstige
hr-HR: Biserna površina uvjet: Oštećeno (jako); Čisto; Jako točkasto; Blago točkasto; Umjereno točkasto; Ostalo
ko: 진주 표면 상태: 흠집 있음(심함); 클린; 반점 많음; 반점 적음; 반점 보통; 기타
fr: État de surface de la perle: Avec défauts (graves); Sans défauts; Fortement tachetée; Légèrement tachetée; Modérément tachetée; Autre